New York, session 2025-2026, S7708.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The veterans' services law is amended by adding a new 2 section 29-f to read as follows: 3 § 29-f. Veterans' bill of rights. 1. The department shall establish, 4 print, publish and distribute a veterans' bill of rights. Such bill of 5 rights shall include the following or substantially similar text 6 describing the existing rights of veterans under current law: 7 "VETERANS' BILL OF RIGHTS 8 You as a veteran have a right: 9 1. To apply for veterans' benefits for which you may be eligible; 10 2. To receive assistance from your local state veterans' service agen- 11 cy and all offices of the New York state department of veterans' 12 services; 13 3. To receive, upon request, an explanation of any services and bene- 14 fits available under federal and New York state laws, rules and regu- 15 lations; 16 4. To receive written notice and an explanation of the approval or 17 denial of your application for benefits available through the New York 18 state department of veterans' services; 19 5. To be treated with dignity and respect; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09703-07-6 S. 7708--B 2 1 6. To appeal, subject to applicable law, an adverse determination or 2 denial of your application for services or benefits available through 3 the New York state department of veterans' services; 4 7. To expect confidentiality to the extent provided by law; 5 8. To receive fair and equal treatment without regard to sex, race, 6 religion, disability, ethnicity, gender identity or national origin; and 7 9. To receive, upon request, information relating to assistance 8 provided to veterans in the state of New York including but not limited 9 to: legal services; educational, employment, or housing opportunities; 10 assistance with discharge upgrades and/or character of service determi- 11 nations; tax benefits, including real property and personal taxes; and 12 the veterans notation on New York state driver's license or non-driver 13 identification cards." 14 2. The department shall conspicuously post the veterans' bill of 15 rights on the department's website and shall make the veterans' bill of 16 rights available to county and city veterans' service agencies. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 18 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment, 19 and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation 20 of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 21 completed on or before such effective date.